Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 28.33.190.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“alcoholic beverage” has the meaning given in AS

04.21.080(b)

;

“commerce” means

any trade, traffic, or transportation within the jurisdiction of the United States between a place in a state and a place outside of the United States; and

trade, traffic, and transportation in the United States that affects any trade, traffic, and transportation described in (A) of this paragraph;

“commercial driver’s license” means a license issued by a state or other jurisdiction, in accordance with the standards contained in 49 C.F.R. 383, to an individual authorizing the individual to operate a class of a commercial motor vehicle;

“commercial motor vehicle” has the meaning given in AS

28.90.990

;

“controlled substance” means any substance listed as being controlled under AS 11.71 or 21 U.S.C. 812 — 813, or determined under federal regulations to be controlled for purposes of 21 U.S.C. 801 — 813 (Controlled Substances Act);

“conviction” means an unvacated adjudication or conviction of guilt, or a determination that a person has violated or failed to comply with the law in a court of original jurisdiction or by an authorized administrative agency, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure the person’s appearance in court, a plea of guilty or nolo contendere accepted by the court, the payment of a fine or court cost, or violation of a condition of release without bail, regardless of whether the penalty is rebated, suspended, or probated;

“disqualification” means a withdrawal of the privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle;

“disqualified” means that a person’s privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle has been withdrawn;

“domicile” means a state of the United States where a person has the person’s true, fixed, and permanent home and principal residence and to which the person has the intention of returning whenever the person is absent;

“drive a commercial motor vehicle” means to affect the movement, attempt to affect the movement, or to be in actual physical control, of a commercial motor vehicle in motion, excluding slight motion incidental to loading, unloading, servicing, or inspecting the vehicle;

“employer” means a person who

provides compensation to a person who operates a commercial motor vehicle, including wages or other remuneration, whether through an employment relationship or by contract; or

acts as an agent of someone who provides compensation to a person who operates a commercial motor vehicle, with authority to allow, require, permit, assign, or authorize the person being compensated to operate a commercial motor vehicle;

“hazardous material” means any material that has been designated as hazardous under 49 U.S.C. 5103 and is required to be placarded under subpart F of 49 C.F.R. 172 or any quantity of a material listed as a select agent or toxin in 42 C.F.R. 73;

“imminent hazard” means the existence of a condition that presents a substantial likelihood that death, serious illness, severe personal injury, or a substantial endangerment to health, property, or the environment may occur before the reasonably foreseeable completion date of a formal proceeding by the United States Department of Transportation begun to lessen the risk of that death, illness, injury, or endangerment;

“operating a commercial motor vehicle” means

to drive a commercial motor vehicle; or

whether or not the vehicle is in motion, or is capable of being moved, to be in actual physical control, or to attempt to affect the movement, of a commercial motor vehicle;

“out-of-service order” means an order issued under regulations adopted under AS

19.10.060(c)

or AS

28.05.011

that prohibits an owner or operator of a commercial motor vehicle from operating a commercial motor vehicle; and

“serious traffic violation” means

speeding 15 miles per hour or more above the posted limit;

reckless or negligent driving, in violation of AS

28.35.400

or

28.35.410

or an ordinance with substantially similar elements;

violation of a provision of this title, or a regulation adopted under this title, relating to improper lane changes or following too closely, or an ordinance with substantially similar elements;

violation of a law or ordinance relating to traffic control, which was determined by the court by a preponderance of the evidence to have been a factor in causing physical injury to a person;

driving a commercial motor vehicle without obtaining a license to drive a commercial motor vehicle;

driving a commercial motor vehicle without a license to drive a commercial motor vehicle in the driver’s possession; however, if an individual provides proof to the department by the date that the individual was required to appear in court or pay any fine for that violation that the individual held a valid license to drive a commercial motor vehicle on the date the citation was issued, the driving may not be considered as a serious traffic violation under this paragraph;

driving a commercial motor vehicle without the proper class of license to drive a commercial motor vehicle and any required endorsements for the specific vehicle group being operated, or for the passengers or type of cargo being transported; or

driving a commercial motor vehicle in violation of AS

28.35.161

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 53 SLA 1990; am § 20 ch 3 SLA 1992; am § 6 ch 55 SLA 1994; am § 24 ch 6 FSSLA 1996; am § 17 ch 33 SLA 1999; am § 4 ch 80 SLA 2003; am §§ 25, 26, 31 ch 23 SLA 2007; am § 13 ch 80 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 28.33.300 and renumbered in 1990.
In 1996 and 2007 the paragraphs were renumbered to maintain the alphabetical order.
In 2006, in (3) of this section, “AS

28.90.990

” was substituted for “AS

28.40.100

” and in (16)(B) of this section, “AS

28.35.400

or

28.35.410

” was substituted for “AS

28.35.040

or

28.35.045

” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of AS

28.35.040

,

28.35.045

, and

28.40.100

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 11, 2014, added (16)(H), and made a related change.